Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Risk Based Capital for Insurers

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 26, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 26-48-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Adjusted RBC report” means an RBC report which has been adjusted by the commissioner in accordance with W.S.

26-48-102

(d);

“Corrective order” means an order issued by the commissioner specifying corrective actions which the commissioner has determined are required;

“Domestic insurer” means any insurance company formed under the laws of Wyoming excluding title insurers, health maintenance organizations and hospital or medical service insurers;

“Foreign insurer” means any insurance company which is licensed to do business in this state but is not domiciled in this state excluding title insurers, health maintenance organizations and hospital or medical service insurers;

“NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

“Negative trend” means with respect to a life or disability insurer a negative trend over a period of time, as determined in accordance with the “trend test calculation” included in the life RBC instructions;

“RBC” means risk-based capital;

“RBC instructions” means the RBC report including risk-based capital instructions adopted by the commissioner, and as may be amended by the commissioner;

“RBC level” means an insurer’s company action level RBC, regulatory action level RBC, authorized control level RBC or mandatory control level RBC where:

“Company action level RBC” means, with respect to any insurer, the product of two (2) and its authorized control level RBC;

“Regulatory action level RBC” means the product of one and one-half (1 1/2) and its authorized control level RBC;

“Authorized control level RBC” means the number determined under the risk-based capital formula in accordance with the RBC instructions. This number for life or disability insurers is equal to fifty percent (50%) of the sum of the business risk-based capital plus the square root of the sum of the asset risk-based capital plus the interest rate risk-based capital squared plus the insurance risk-based capital squared. This number for property and casualty insurers is equal to forty-five percent (45%) for 1995, fifty percent (50%) for 1996, and after, of the square root of the sum of the squares of loss reserve risk, premiums written risk, investment risk and credit risk, plus total investments in affiliates, noncontrolled assets, guarantees for affiliates and contingent liabilities;

“Mandatory control level RBC” means the product of seven tenths (.7) and the authorized control level RBC.

“RBC plan” means a comprehensive financial plan containing the elements specified in W.S. 26-48-103(b). If the commissioner rejects the RBC plan, and it is revised by the insurer, with or without the commissioner’s recommendation, the plan shall be called the “revised RBC plan”;

“RBC report” means the report required in W.S.

26-48-102

;

“Total adjusted capital” means the sum of:

An insurer’s statutory capital and surplus; and

Such other items, if any, as the RBC instructions may provide.

“Life or disability insurer” means any insurance company licensed in the lines of life, disability, or both, or a licensed property and casualty insurer writing only accident and health insurance, but shall not include health maintenance organizations or hospital or medical service insurers;

“Property and casualty insurer” means any insurance company licensed in the lines of property, casualty, surety, marine and transportation, or any combination of these lines, but shall not include monoline mortgage guaranty insurers, financial guaranty insurers or title insurers.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1; 2010, ch. 26, § 1; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(vi), inserted “life” preceding “RBC instructions.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (a)(iii) and (a)(iv), deleted “farm mutual insurers” following “health maintenance organizations”; in (a)(xiv), deleted “farm mutual insurers” following “financial guaranty insurers”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-48-102.
Risk-based capital reports.

Every domestic insurer shall, annually on or prior to March 1, prepare and submit to the commissioner a report of its RBC levels as of the end of the calendar year just ended, in a form and containing information as required by the RBC instructions. In addition, every domestic insurer shall file its RBC report:

With the NAIC in accordance with the RBC instructions; and

With the insurance commissioner in any state in which the insurer is authorized to do business, if the insurance commissioner has notified the insurer of its request in writing, in which case the insurer shall file its RBC report not later than the later of:

Fifteen (15) days from the receipt of notice to file its RBC report with that state; or

The filing date specified in subsection (a) of this section.

A life or disability insurer’s RBC shall be determined in accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC instructions and this article. The formula shall take into account, and may adjust for the covariance between the following which are determined in each case by applying the factors in the manner set forth in the RBC instructions:

The risk with respect to the insurer’s assets;

The risk of adverse insurance experience with respect to the insurer’s liabilities and obligations;

The interest rate risk with respect to the insurer’s business; and

All other business risks and other relevant risks as set forth in the RBC instructions.

A property and casualty insurer’s RBC shall be determined in accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC instructions and this article. The formula shall take into account, and may adjust for the covariance between the following which are determined in each case by applying the factors in the manner set forth in the RBC instructions:

Asset risk;

Credit risk;

Underwriting risk; and

All other business risks and such other relevant risks as are set forth in the RBC instructions.

If a domestic insurer files an RBC report which in the judgment of the commissioner is inaccurate, the commissioner shall adjust the RBC report to correct the inaccuracy and shall notify the insurer of the adjustment. The notice shall contain a statement of the reason for the adjustment. A RBC report as so adjusted is referred to as an “adjusted RBC report.”

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1; 2004, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “March 1” for “March 15” in (a).

§ 26-48-103.
Company action level event.

“Company action level event” means any of the following events:

The filing of an RBC report by an insurer which indicates any of the following:

The insurer’s total adjusted capital is greater than or equal to its regulatory action level RBC but less than its company action level RBC;

If a life or disability insurer, the insurer has total adjusted capital which is greater than or equal to its company action level RBC but less than the product of authorized control level RBC and three (3), and has a negative trend; or

If a property and casualty insurer, the insurer has total adjusted capital which is greater than or equal to its company action level RBC but less than three (3) times its authorized control level RBC and triggers the trend test in accordance with the trend test calculation included in the property and casualty RBC instructions.

The notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in subparagraph (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this section, provided the insurer does not challenge the adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

; or

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in subparagraph (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this section, under W.S.

26-48-107

, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

In the event of a company action level event, the insurer shall prepare and submit to the commissioner an RBC plan which shall:

Identify the conditions in the insurer which contribute to the company action level event;

Contain proposals of corrective actions which the insurer intends to take and would be expected to result in the elimination of the company action level event;

Provide projections of the insurer’s financial results in the current year and at least the four (4) succeeding years, both in the absence of proposed corrective actions and giving effect to the proposed corrective actions, including projections of statutory operating income, net income, capital and surplus;

Identify the key assumptions impacting the insurer’s projections and the sensitivity of the projections to the assumptions; and

Identify the quality of, and problems associated with, the insurer’s business, including but not limited to its assets, anticipated business growth and associated surplus strain, extraordinary exposure to risk, mix of business and use of reinsurance in each case, if any.

The RBC plan shall be submitted:

Within forty-five (45) days of the company action level event; or

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

, within forty-five (45) days after notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

Within sixty (60) days after the submission by an insurer of an RBC plan to the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the insurer whether the RBC plan shall be implemented or is, in the judgment of the commissioner, unsatisfactory. If the commissioner determines the RBC plan is unsatisfactory, the notification to the insurer shall set forth the reasons for the determination, and may set forth proposed revisions which will render the RBC plan satisfactory, in the judgment of the commissioner. Upon notification from the commissioner, the insurer shall prepare a revised RBC plan, which may incorporate by reference any revisions proposed by the commissioner, and shall submit the revised RBC plan to the commissioner:

Within forty-five (45) days after the notification from the commissioner; or

If the insurer challenges the notification from the commissioner under W.S.

26-48-107

, within forty-five (45) days after a notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

In the event of a notification by the commissioner to an insurer that the insurer’s RBC plan or revised RBC plan is unsatisfactory, the commissioner may at his discretion, subject to the insurer’s right to a hearing under W.S.

26-48-107

, specify in the notification that the notification constitutes a regulatory action level event.

Every domestic insurer which files an RBC plan or revised RBC plan with the commissioner shall file a copy of the RBC plan or revised RBC plan with the insurance commissioner in any state in which the insurer is authorized to do business if:

The state has an RBC provision substantially similar to W.S. 26-48-108(a); and

The insurance commissioner of that state has notified the insurer of its request for the filing in writing, in which case the insurer shall file a copy of the RBC plan or revised RBC plan in that state no later than the later of:

Fifteen (15) days after the receipt of notice to file a copy of its RBC plan or revised RBC plan with the state; or

The date on which the RBC plan or revised RBC plan is filed under subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1; 2010, ch. 26, § 1; 2012, ch. 38, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “any of the following” for “that” in the introductory clause of (a)(i); added (a)(i)(C); and made stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “three (3)” for “two and one-half (2 1/2)” in (a)(i)(B).

§ 26-48-104.
Regulatory action level event.

“Regulatory action level event” means, with respect to any insurer, any of the following events:

The filing of an RBC report by the insurer which indicates that the insurer’s total adjusted capital is greater than or equal to its authorized control level RBC but less than its regulatory action level RBC;

The notification by the commissioner to an insurer of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection, provided the insurer does not challenge the adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

;

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection, under W.S.

26-48-107

, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge;

The failure of the insurer to file an RBC report annually by March 15, unless the insurer has provided an explanation for the failure which is satisfactory to the commissioner and has filed an RBC report by March 25;

The failure of the insurer to submit an RBC plan to the commissioner within the time period set forth in W.S. 26-48-103(c);

Notification by the commissioner to the insurer that:

The RBC plan or revised RBC plan submitted by the insurer is, in the judgment of the commissioner, unsatisfactory; and

Such notification constitutes a regulatory action level event with respect to the insurer, provided the insurer has not challenged the determination under W.S. 26-48-107.

If the insurer challenges a determination by the commissioner under paragraph (vi) of this subsection pursuant to W.S. 26-48-107, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the challenge;

Notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the insurer has failed to adhere to its RBC plan or revised RBC plan, but only if the failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the company action level event in accordance with its RBC plan or revised RBC plan and the commissioner has so stated in the notification, provided the insurer has not challenged the determination under W.S. 26-48-107; or

If the insurer challenges a determination by the commissioner under paragraph (viii) of this subsection pursuant to W.S. 26-48-107, the notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the challenge, unless the failure of the insurer to adhere to its RBC plan or revised RBC plan has no substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the regulatory action level event with respect to the insurer.

In the event of a regulatory action level event the commissioner shall:

Require the insurer to prepare and submit an RBC plan or, if applicable, a revised RBC plan;

Perform an examination or analysis as he deems necessary of the assets, liabilities and operations of the insurer including a review of its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; and

Subsequent to the examination or analysis, issue an order specifying the corrective actions he determines are required.

In determining corrective actions, the commissioner may take into account factors deemed relevant with respect to the insurer based upon his examination or analysis of the assets, liabilities and operations of the insurer, including, but not limited to, the results of any sensitivity tests undertaken pursuant to the RBC instructions. The RBC plan or revised RBC plan shall be submitted:

Within forty-five (45) days after the occurrence of the regulatory action level event;

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

, within forty-five (45) days after the notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge; or

If the insurer challenges a revised RBC plan under W.S.

26-48-107

, within forty-five (45) days after notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

The commissioner may retain actuaries and investment experts and other consultants necessary in the judgment of the commissioner to review the insurer’s RBC plan or revised RBC plan, examine or analyze the assets, liabilities and operations of the insurer and formulate the corrective order with respect to the insurer. The fees, costs and expenses relating to consultants shall be borne by the affected insurer or other party as directed by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 26-48-105.
Authorized control level event.

“Authorized control level event” means any of the following events:

The filing of an RBC report by the insurer which indicates that the insurer’s total adjusted capital is greater than or equal to its mandatory control level RBC but less than its authorized control level RBC;

The notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection, provided the insurer does not challenge the adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

;

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection, under W.S.

26-48-107

, notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge;

The failure of the insurer to respond, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner, to a corrective order, provided the insurer has not challenged the corrective order under W.S. 26-48-107; or

If the insurer has challenged a corrective order under W.S. 26-48-107 and the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the challenge or modified the corrective order, the failure of the insurer to respond, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner, to the corrective order subsequent to the rejection or modification by the commissioner.

In the event of an authorized control level event with respect to an insurer, the commissioner shall:

Take actions required under W.S.

26-48-104

regarding an insurer with respect to which a regulatory action level event has occurred; or

If the commissioner deems it to be in the best interests of the policyholders and creditors of the insurer and of the public, take actions necessary to cause the insurer to be placed under regulatory control under chapter 28 of this code. In the event the commissioner determines to take such action, the authorized control level event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to proceed under chapter 28, and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth in that chapter.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 26-48-106.
Mandatory control level event.

“Mandatory control level event” means any of the following events:

The filing of an RBC report which indicates that the insurer’s total adjusted capital is less than its mandatory control level RBC;

Notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection, provided the insurer does not challenge the adjusted RBC report under W.S.

26-48-107

; or

If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in paragraph (i) of this subsection under W.S.

26-48-107

, notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer’s challenge.

In the event of a mandatory control level event:

With respect to a life or disability insurer, the commissioner shall take actions necessary to cause the insurer to be placed under regulatory control under chapter 28 of this code. In that event, the mandatory control level event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to take action under chapter 28, and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth in that chapter. The commissioner may forego action under this subsection for up to ninety (90) days after the mandatory control level event if he finds there is a reasonable expectation that the mandatory control level event may be eliminated within the ninety (90) day period;

With respect to a property and casualty insurer, the commissioner shall take actions necessary to cause the insurer to be placed under regulatory control under chapter 28 of this code, or, in the case of an insurer which is writing no business and which is running-off its existing business, may allow the insurer to continue its run-off under the supervision of the commissioner. In either event, the mandatory control level event shall be deemed sufficient grounds for the commissioner to take action under chapter 28 and the commissioner shall have the rights, powers and duties with respect to the insurer as are set forth in that chapter. The commissioner may forego action under this subsection for up to ninety (90) days after the mandatory control level event if he finds there is a reasonable expectation that the mandatory control level event may be eliminated within the ninety (90) day period.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

“This code,” as used in this section, means Title 26 of the Wyoming statutes.

§ 26-48-107.
Hearings.

An insurer shall have the right to a departmental hearing, on a record, at which the insurer may challenge any of the following determinations or actions by the commissioner:

Notification to an insurer by the commissioner of an adjusted RBC report;

Notification to an insurer by the commissioner that:

The insurer’s RBC plan or revised RBC plan is unsatisfactory; and

The notification constitutes a regulatory action level event with respect to the insurer.

Notification to any insurer by the commissioner that the insurer has failed to adhere to its RBC plan or revised RBC plan and that the failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the insurer to eliminate the company action level event with respect to the insurer in accordance with its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; or

Notification to an insurer by the commissioner of a corrective order with respect to the insurer.

An insurer seeking a hearing under this section shall notify the commissioner of its request for a hearing within five (5) days after the notification by the commissioner under subsection (a) of this section. Upon receipt of the insurer’s request for a hearing, the commissioner shall set a date for the hearing, which shall be no less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days after the date of the insurer’s request.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 26-48-108.
Confidentiality and prohibition on announcements.

To the extent the information therein is not required to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement schedule, all RBC reports and RBC plans, including the results or report of any examination or analysis of an insurer performed pursuant to this article, and any corrective order issued by the commissioner pursuant to examination or analysis, with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer which are filed with the commissioner constitute information that might be damaging to the insurer if made available to its competitors, and shall be kept confidential by the commissioner. This information shall not be made public, other than by the commissioner and then only for the purpose of enforcement actions taken by the commissioner pursuant to this article or any other provision of the insurance laws of this state. W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

shall not apply to the documents or information described in this section.

Except as otherwise required under the provisions of this article, making, publishing, disseminating, circulating or placing before the public, an advertisement, announcement or statement containing a representation or statement with regard to the RBC levels of any insurer, or of any component derived in the calculation, by any insurer, agent, broker or other person engaged in any manner in the insurance business is prohibited. If any materially false statement with respect to the comparison regarding an insurer’s total adjusted capital to its RBC levels, or any of them, or an inappropriate comparison of any other amount to the insurers’ RBC levels is published in any written publication and the insurer is able to demonstrate to the commissioner with substantial proof of the falsity or inappropriateness of the statement, the insurer may publish an announcement in a written publication for the sole purpose of rebutting the statement.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 26-48-109.
Supplemental provisions; rulemaking authority; exceptions; limitations.

The provisions of this article are supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of this state, and shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the commissioner under those laws, including, but not limited to, chapter 28 of this code, W.S.

26-3-115

and

26-3-116

.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this article.

The commissioner may exempt from the application of this chapter any domestic property and casualty insurer which:

Writes direct business only in Wyoming;

Writes direct annual premiums of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) or less; and

Assumes no reinsurance in excess of five percent (5%) of direct premium written.

The RBC instructions, RBC reports, adjusted RBC reports, RBC plans and revised RBC plans may be used solely by the commissioner in monitoring the solvency of insurers and determining the need for possible corrective action with respect to insurers and shall not be used by the commissioner for rate making nor considered or introduced as evidence in any rate proceeding nor used by the commissioner to calculate or derive any elements of an appropriate premium level or rate of return for any line of insurance which an insurer or any affiliate is authorized to write.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

“This code,” as used in this section, means Title 26 of the Wyoming statutes.

§ 26-48-110.
Foreign Insurers.

Any foreign insurer not subject to a substantially similar RBC law in its domicile, shall submit to the commissioner an RBC report on or before March 15, for the preceding calendar year. Any other foreign insurer shall, upon the written request of the commissioner, submit to the commissioner an RBC report as of the end of the calendar year just ended by the later of:

The date an RBC report would be required to be filed by a domestic insurer under this article; or

Fifteen (15) days after the request is received by the foreign insurer.

Any foreign insurer shall, at the written request of the commissioner, within fifteen (15) business days submit to the commissioner a copy of any RBC plan that is filed with the insurance commissioner of any other state.

Pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner, in the event of a company action level event, regulatory action level event or authorized control level event, the commissioner may require the foreign insurer to file an RBC plan with the commissioner. In such event, the failure of the foreign insurer to file an RBC plan with the commissioner shall be grounds to order the insurer to cease and desist from writing new insurance business in this state.

In the event of a mandatory control level event with respect to any foreign insurer, if no domiciliary receiver has been appointed with respect to the foreign insurer under the rehabilitation and liquidation statute applicable in the state of domicile of the foreign insurer, the commissioner may make application for the appointment of a receiver to the district court of Laramie county as permitted under chapter 28 of this code. The occurrence of the mandatory control level event shall be considered adequate grounds for the application.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 26-48-111.
Notices.

All notices by the commissioner to an insurer which may result in regulatory action under this article shall be effective upon mailing if transmitted by registered or certified mail, or in the case of any other transmission shall be effective upon the insurer’s receipt of the notice.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 26-48-112.
Phase-in provision.

For RBC reports required to be filed by life or disability insurers with respect to 1994, the following requirements shall apply in lieu of the provisions of W.S.

26-48-103

through

26-48-106

:

In the event of a company action level event with respect to a domestic insurer, the commissioner shall take no regulatory action under this chapter;

In the event of a regulatory action level event under W.S.

26-48-104

(a)(i) through (iii) the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S.

26-48-103

;

In the event of a regulatory action level event under W.S.

26-48-104

(a)(iv) through (ix) or an authorized control level event, the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S. 26-48-104 with respect to the insurer;

In the event of a mandatory control level event, the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S.

26-48-105

with respect to the insurer.

For RBC reports required to be filed by property and casualty insurers with respect to 1995, the following requirements shall apply in lieu of the provisions of W.S.

26-48-103

through

26-48-106

:

In the event of a company action level event with respect to a domestic insurer, the commissioner shall take no regulatory action under this chapter;

In the event of a regulatory action level event under W.S.

26-48-104

(a)(i) through (iii) the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S.

26-48-103

;

In the event of a regulatory action level event under W.S.

26-48-104

(a)(iv) through (ix) or an authorized control level event, the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S. 26-48-104 with respect to the insurer;

In the event of a mandatory control level event with respect to an insurer, the commissioner shall take the actions required under W.S.

26-48-105

with respect to the insurer.

W.S. 26-48-110(a) shall not be effective for any foreign insurer until July 1, 1996, unless the commissioner requests in writing that the foreign insurer submit an RBC report.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 140, § 1.